Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 17 LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT CODE — GUARANTEE FUND
§ 50-1719. Additional improvements.

Whenever any assessment is levied on any property for further, separate or additional improvement under the provisions of this code or any law of this state, such assessment shall be a subsequent lien upon the property so assessed to the lien of the unpaid assessments theretofore made for the original improvement. Whenever any assessment is made for such further, separate or additional improvement on property on which an existing assessment has been levied for improvements, such further, separate or additional assessment for improvement shall not be construed or considered as for one and the same improvement, or for the same purpose or for the same benefit, or as a double assessment for improvements against the property being assessed for the payment of the cost and expense of such improvement but shall be considered and construed as a separate, distinct, single and independent improvement on and of benefit to the property so assessed. All assessments so levied or bonds or warrants issued payable from the same shall be considered and construed as assessments levied or bonds or warrants issued for separate, distinct, single and independent improvements and benefits on and to the property so assessed.

§ 50-1720. Reassessment of benefits.

In all cases of assessments for local improvements of any kind against any property wherein said assessments have failed to be valid in whole or in part for want of form or sufficiency, informality, irregularity or nonconformance with the charter provisions, or laws governing such assessments, the council shall be and is hereby authorized to reassess such assessments and to enforce their collection in accordance with the provisions of law existing at the time the reassessment is made. No mistake in description of the property or the name of the owner thereof shall affect the validity of any assessment or any lien created thereby under the provisions of this code, or any law of this state, unless such mistake or error renders it impossible to identify the property so assessed.

When for any cause, mistake, or inadvertence, the amount assessed on any property is insufficient to pay the cost and expenses of the improvement made and enjoyed by the owner of such property, it shall be lawful, and the council is hereby directed and authorized, to make reassessments on said property sufficient in amount to pay for such improvements, the reassessment to be made and collected in accordance with the provisions of law existing at the time of its levy.

§ 50-1721. Lien of assessment — Foreclosure.

Assessments levied to pay the cost and expense of any improvement authorized by the provisions of this code, or any law of this state, shall constitute a lien upon and against the property upon which such assessment or assessments are made and levied from and after the date upon which the ordinance levying such assessment or assessments is passed, which lien shall be superior to the lien of any mortgage or other encumbrance, whether prior in time or not, and shall constitute such lien until paid, and until paid, such lien shall not, except as otherwise provided in this section, be subject to extinguishment, including but not limited to extinguishment by reason of the sale of the property assessed on account of the nonpayment of general taxes or the conveyance of such property by any means to the United States of America, or any agency thereof, the state of Idaho, or any county, city, school district, community college district, or other public body, agency or taxing unit in said state. When bonds have not been issued and said assessments made payable in installments as herein provided, such assessments shall be collected, or the property therein shall be foreclosed and sold for such assessments and costs, in a suit for that purpose by the municipality. Delinquent assessments certified to the tax collector for collection as provided in section 50-1715, Idaho Code, shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 10, title 63, Idaho Code. All provisions of chapter 10, title 63, Idaho Code, specifically including those governing collection, satisfaction, and extinguishment of delinquent amounts, shall apply to certified delinquent assessments in the same manner and to the same effect as delinquent property taxes.

Such suit shall be in the name of the municipality as plaintiff and against any one (1) or more owners of property failing to pay such assessment or assessments as defendants. In any such proceedings where the court trying the same shall be satisfied that the improvements have been made or have been contracted for, which according to the true intent of this code would be properly chargeable to such property, a recovery shall be permitted and the lien enforced to the extent of the cost and expenses of the improvement which would be chargeable on such property notwithstanding any informality, irregularity or defect in any of the proceedings of such municipality or any of its officers, and such property shall be ordered sold for the payment of the assessment or assessments against it and the costs and expenses of such suit, including reasonable attorney’s fees, to be fixed by the court and prorated to each separate piece of property.

Parties.

Purchasers of bond sold by city pending action to restrain levy of assessment need not be made parties before judgment could be rendered restraining collection of assessments for payment of bonds. Lucas v. City of Nampa, 41 Idaho 35, 238 P. 288 (1925).

Where suit was instituted by taxpayer before bonds were sold or delivered, city could not defeat right of action by transferring such bonds and contending that bondholders were not parties to action. Lucas v. City of Nampa, 41 Idaho 35, 238 P. 288 (1925).

§ 50-1721A. Segregation of assessments.

Whenever any land against which there has been levied any special assessment by any municipality shall have been sold in part or subdivided, the council of that municipality shall have the power to order a segregation of the assessment.

Any person desiring to have such a special assessment against a tract of land segregated to apply to smaller parts thereof shall apply to the municipality which levied the assessment. If the council determines that a segregation should be made, it shall by ordinance order the clerk to make segregation on the original assessment roll as directed in the ordinance. The segregation shall be made as nearly as possible on the same basis as the original assessment was levied, and the total of the segregated parts of the assessment shall equal the assessment before segregation. The ordinance shall describe the original tract, the amount and date of the original assessment, and shall define the boundaries of the divided parts and the amount of the assessment chargeable to each part. A certified copy of the ordinance shall be filed with the county recorder. The council may require, as a condition to the order of segregation, that the person seeking it pay the municipality the reasonable engineering and clerical costs incident to making the segregation. No segregation need be made if the council shall find that by such segregation the security of the lien for such assessment will be so jeopardized as to reduce the security for any outstanding local improvement district obligations payable from such assessment.

§ 50-1722. Bonds — Registered warrants — Interim warrants.

If the council determines to make assessments payable in installments as is provided in section 50-1715, Idaho Code, it shall be [by] ordinance issued [issue] in the name of the municipality improvement bonds of the improvement district payable from assessments levied against the property within the district. Such bonds shall be payable each year from and after the date of the bonds and shall be of such denomination and bear interest, payable annually, at such rate as is determined by the council, but in no event shall such rate of interest be greater than the rate of interest borne by the unpaid assessments.

The bonds shall be in such form and denomination as may be provided by the council and they shall mature serially over a period not exceeding thirty (30) years. The council may reserve the right to redeem any of the bonds at its option on any interest payment at such price or prices as determined by the council. The bonds shall be signed by the mayor of the city, the chairman of the board of county commissioners, the president of the highway district, or the chairman of the board of directors of a water and/or sewer district, as the case may be, and shall be countersigned by the treasurer and attested by the clerk of the municipality. No bond or coupon shall be invalid because an officer whose manual or facsimile signature thereon has ceased to hold office at the time of the delivery of the bonds so long as he held the office at the time such signature was placed on the bond or coupon. The coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signatures of said officers and each bond shall have the seal of the municipality affixed thereto. Each bond shall provide that the principal thereof and the interest thereon are payable solely from the principal of an [and] interest on the unpaid assessments levied in the district to pay the total cost and expenses of the project concerned.

In lieu of bonds, registered warrants may be issued under the same circumstances and in the same manner as bonds, such warrants to be issued in payment of any or all costs or expenses of the improvements to the amount said costs or expenses were set out in the engineer’s report. The warrants shall be redeemable in numerical order and further shall be subject to all provisions of this code relating to local improvement bonds so far as the same may be applicable, including, but not limited to, the provisions of sections 50-1762 to 50-1769, Idaho Code.

If the council shall determine to issue and sell bonds, it may for the purpose of meeting any cost and expenses of making the improvements, as the same are installed prior to the sale of the bonds, issue interim warrants of the district payable to the contractor, [or] other proper person, upon estimates of the engineer, bearing interest at a rate provided by the council, which interim warrants together with the interest due thereon at the date of the issue of the bonds, shall be redeemed and retired from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or prepayment of assessments.

§ 50-1723. Liability of municipality.

The holder of any bond, issued under the authority of this code, shall have no claim therefor against the municipality by which the same is issued, except to the extent of the funds created and received by assessments against the property within any local improvement district as herein provided and to the extent of the local improvement guarantee fund which may be established by any such municipality under the provisions of this code, but the municipality shall be held responsible for the lawful levy of all special taxes or assessments herein provided and for the faithful accounting of settlements and payments of the special taxes and assessments levied for the payment of the bonds as herein provided. The owners and holders of such bonds shall be entitled to complete enforcement of all assessments made for the payment of such bonds. A copy of this section shall be plainly written, printed or engraved on the face of each bond so issued.

§ 50-1724. Bond and interest funds.

Once bonds are issued as provided herein, any funds paid as installment payments of assessments pledged to the payment of such bonds shall be kept in a fund known as the “bond fund” of the district and any funds paid as interest on said installment payments of assessments shall be kept in a fund known as the “interest fund” of the district. The funds shall be deposited in such bank or banks as are designated as depositors of public moneys of such municipalities under the laws of this state, or invested in bonds or warrants of the municipality. Interest received on such funds so deposited or invested shall be placed to the credit of the fund from which it is earned. Maturing bonds shall be paid from the bond fund and the interest on the bonds, when due, shall be paid from the interest fund. If there is sufficient money in the bond fund to pay the principal of one or more bonds, the treasurer may call in and pay such bonds as of the next interest payment date in such manner as may be provided by the council at the time of the issuance of the bonds. The bonds to be called shall be selected by lot and shall, in the event less than all of the outstanding bonds are to be redeemed, insofar as can be done taking into consideration the denominations of the outstanding bonds, represent an equal amount of bonds from each maturity outstanding at the time of the redemption.

§ 50-1725. Reissue of bonds.

Where any bonds issued under this code are declared invalid or void by order or decree of court, which may be legally reissued, the council of such municipality shall, by ordinance, provide for the reissuance thereof at the same rate of interest and in such amount as will cover the principal and interest due on said bonds, and the ordinance providing for such reissue shall provide for the surrender and cancellation of such bonds upon which there has been a default or which have been declared invalid or void and the lien created by the levy of such assessment or assessments as herein provided shall not be deemed to have been lost or waived by such reissue but shall remain in full force and effect.

§ 50-1726. Rights against assessments.

The said bonds of any local improvement district as herein provided, when sold as hereinbefore provided, shall transfer to the owner or holder of such bonds all the rights and interest of such municipality in and with respect to every such assessment and the lien thereby created against the property of each owner assessed as shall not have availed himself of the provisions of this code, in regard to the redemption of his property as aforesaid, and shall authorize owners and holders of such bonds to receive and have collected the assessment or assessments embraced in any such bonds through any of the methods provided by law for the collection of assessments for local improvements.

Whenever any installment of an assessment or the interest thereon made for the payment of principal, or interest on such bonds so issued, is not paid when due and shall become delinquent, the municipality may by a resolution duly adopted declare all unpaid installments against any property to pay the cost and expenses of such improvement to be immediately due, payable and delinquent, and may thereupon cause a delinquency certificate to be issued against said property for the whole of the unpaid assessment against it in the manner hereinafter provided for issuance of delinquency certificates upon any installment of such assessment(’s) becoming delinquent, and any such council must pass such resolution upon the written request of the holders of one-half (1/2) of any such bond issue, filed with the clerk.

§ 50-1727. Publication and conclusiveness of proceedings.

The council may provide for the publication of any ordinance, resolution or other proceeding adopted by it pursuant to this code in the official newspaper of the municipality. For a period of thirty (30) days after such publication any person in interest shall have the right to contest the legality of such ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds which may be authorized thereby. No contest or proceeding to question the validity or legality of any ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds which may be authorized thereby, passed or adopted under the provisions of this code shall be brought in any court by any person for any cause whatsoever, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date when the ordinance, resolution or proceeding was published, and after such time the validity, legality and regularity of such ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds authorized thereby shall be conclusively presumed. If the question of validity of any bonds issued pursuant to this code is not raised within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the ordinance, resolution or proceeding issuing said bonds and fixing their terms, the authority to issue the bonds, the legality thereof and of the assessments necessary to pay the same shall be conclusively presumed and no court shall thereafter have authority to inquire into such matters.

§ 50-1728. Consolidated local improvement districts authorized.

Solely for the purpose of issuing bonds, registered warrants, or interim warrants, the governing body of any municipality may authorize the establishment of consolidated local improvement districts. The original local improvement districts so consolidated need not be contiguous. If the council orders the creation of such consolidated local improvement districts, the moneys received from the installment payment of the principal of and interest on assessments levied within the original local improvement districts shall be deposited in a consolidated local improvement district bond fund and interest fund to be used to pay the principal of and interest on the outstanding consolidated local improvement district bonds or warrants.

§ 50-1729 — 50-1737. Assessments — Bonds. [Repealed.]

§ 50-1738. Delinquent installments.

If any installment or payment is not made as provided hereinbefore and in default, it shall then become delinquent.

§ 50-1739. Delinquent certificates.

As soon as any assessment or installment thereof, of any local improvement district shall become delinquent, the treasurer shall, if such assessment be collected in one (1) payment, mark the same delinquent on the assessment roll, or if for an installment of an assessment, on the “Local Improvement Installment Docket,” and shall add to the amount shown on said assessment roll, or installment docket, a penalty of two per cent (2%) thereon. Within ten (10) days thereafter the treasurer shall prepare and issue to the municipality, in which such local improvement district is located, a delinquency certificate to the property included in each such delinquent assessment or instalment [installment], which certificate shall have the force and effect of a sale of said property to the municipality for the amount thereof, said certificate shall bear date as of the time such assessment or instalment [installment] became delinquent and shall be for the amount thereof plus the penalty charged thereon. Such certificate shall contain, besides the description of the property to be sold, the name of the person assessed, if known, or if unknown, that fact, the amount of the assessment of instalment [installment], plus penalty thereon; the number of the assessment and the name of the improvement district in which assessed; the date when such certificate will go to deed and shall bear interest from date thereof at the rate of ten per cent (10%) per annum. Such certificates shall be made in duplicate, bound together in books in numerical order and filed in the office of the treasurer; provided, that after one (1) such certificate has been issued no further delinquency certificate shall be issued for subsequent instalments [installments] of the same assessment, except as hereinafter provided, and whenever any subsequent installment shall thereafter become delinquent the treasurer shall so mark the same in the installment docket and add the penalty thereto, as hereinbefore provided, and the same shall draw interest at the rate of ten per cent (10%) per annum from date of delinquency until the end of the month in which it is paid.

§ 50-1740. Delinquent certificate register.

Within twenty (20) days after preparing and issuing any delinquency certificate the treasurer shall enter the same in a book to be kept by said treasurer known as “Local Improvement District Delinquency Certificate Register,” which register shall contain in proper columns, the number of the assessment, the name of the district in which assessed, name of the person to whom assessed, if known, description of the property sold, corresponding with the description in the certificate and the assessment roll, amount of assessment, penalty, and the treasurer must regularly number each entry in said register on the margin of said book and put a corresponding number on each original and duplicate delinquency certificate. Such register must contain blank spaces following each entry of a delinquency certificate therein, in which may be entered the name of an assignee thereof, the date of such assignment and the amount paid the assignee, the name of a redemptioner thereof, the date of such redemption and the amount paid by such redemptioner. Such book or register shall be retained by the treasurer and become a part of the records of his office. From and after entry in such register and until two (2) years from its date, any such certificate, unless redeemed, may be purchased from the treasurer in the manner hereinafter provided.

§ 50-1741. Assignment of delinquent certificates.

Whenever any person shall tender to the treasurer in cash the amount of any such certificate and interest thereon at the rate of ten per cent (10%) per annum from date of such certificate to the end of the month in which such purchase is made, together with any subsequent instalments then due with penalties and interest thereon, the treasurer shall assign such delinquency certificate to the purchaser by making and executing for and on behalf of the municipality the blank assignment on both the original and duplicate thereof, and shall deliver the original certificate so assigned to the purchaser. Whenever the purchaser shall be required to pay subsequent assessments in addition to the amount of such delinquency certificate, the fact of such payment and the amount thereof including penalty and interest, shall be indorsed on the original and duplicate certificate so assigned. Thereafter the treasurer shall immediately make the proper entries showing such assignment in the “Local Improvement District Delinquency Register,” and in the “Instalment Docket”; provided, that past due interest coupons and past due bonds of the local improvement district for which such certificate was issued shall be received by the treasurer, at par and accrued interest in payment of such certificates. Such bonds and coupons shall be received by the treasurer, at par and accrued interest in payment of such certificates. Such bonds and coupons shall be forthwith canceled by the treasurer.

§ 50-1742. Form of assignment — Assignment by purchaser.

The assignment prescribed by the preceding section must be substantially in the following form, and indorsed on the certificate:

§ 50-1743. Redemption.

At any time within two (2) years from the date of any delinquency certificate, the owner of the property described therein, or any one on his behalf, may redeem such property by paying to the treasurer the amount stated in such certificate together with interest thereon at the date [rate] of ten per cent (10%) per annum, from date thereof to the last day of the month in which such redemption is made. Thereupon the treasurer shall issue to the redemptioner a certificate of redemption which shall state the name of the redemptioner, the date of redemption, the number of the certificate so redeemed, the description of the property contained therein, and the name of the district for which said certificate was issued. In case said certificate has not been assigned, the treasurer shall note such upon the original and duplicate delinquency certificate; if assigned upon the duplicate certificate the fact that the same has been redeemed, the date of redemption and shall note the same upon the “Local Improvement Delinquency Certificate Register” and the “Local Improvement Instalment Docket”; provided, that no redemption of any such certificate shall be allowed unless all assessments which have become due subsequent to the one for which said delinquency certificate shall have been issued with penalties, and interest at the rate of ten per cent (10%) per annum from date of said delinquency to the end of the month in which the same is redeemed, shall be paid, which fact together with the amount paid shall be stated upon the redemption certificate. The money received from the redemption of any property described in a certificate which has been assigned shall be deposited by the treasurer to the credit of the person named in the last assignment of such certificate. The treasurer shall thereupon give notice to such person at the address shown by the record of such deposit, and such person shall thereafter be paid the same by the treasurer upon surrender of such certificate to the treasurer who shall mark the same “Paid” and hold it as a voucher.

§ 50-1744. Deed.

If the property described in any delinquency certificate is not redeemed within two (2) years from the date thereof, the treasurer, after having given notice hereinafter required, shall issue a deed thereto to the municipality, or if the same has been assigned as hereinbefore provided, then to the person holding the original delinquency certificate under assignment, upon request therefor, and upon the delivery to the treasurer of such original certificate and filing proof of having given notice as required by the treasurer before making a deed to the municipality. Such deed shall recite substantially the matter contained in the certificate and that no person redeemed the property within the time allowed, by law, for its redemption. It shall be signed and acknowledged by the treasurer in the manner required, by law, to entitle the same to be recorded under the laws of this state; provided, that such deed shall not be issued to an assignee until he has paid all subsequent instalments and assessments then delinquent or due upon the property described in the delinquency certificate, together with the penalties and interest thereon. Such deed to an assignee shall be made subject to all unpaid instalments not then due.

§ 50-1745. Notice of expiration of time of redemption.

The treasurer shall, at least one (1) month and not more than three (3) months before the expiration of the time of redemption of any property, serve or cause to be served, a written or printed, or partly written and partly printed notice on the person or persons in the actual possession or occupancy of such land or lots, and shall also, within the same time, serve upon or mail to, the person in whose name the same stands upon the assessment records in the county assessor’s office, a copy of said notice; which notice shall state when the delinquency certificate was made, in whose name the property was assessed, the description of the land or lots, the name of the local improvement district for which assessed, the amount of the assessment or instalment, and when the time of redemption will expire. The treasurer shall at the same time send a similar notice, by mail, to each mortgagee or other holder of a recorded lien against such land, in each case where such mortgagee or lienholder has previously filed in the office of the treasurer a written request for such notice and paid the fee therefor, which request shall include the name and address of the mortgagee, the name of the reputed owner of the land, a description of the land and the date of the expiration of the mortgage or lien; no notice need be sent after the date of expiration, unless a further request therefor be duly filed. If the mortgagee or lienholder shall furnish a duplicate form of request for that purpose the treasurer shall certify thereon to the filing of the request and deliver the same to the party filing it. If there is no person in actual possession or occupancy of such land or lot and if the persons in whose name it stands, upon diligent inquiry cannot be found in the state, then the treasurer shall, within the same time, post or have posted, a copy of said notice in a conspicuous place upon said land or lots and in a substantial manner.

Whenever any notice is mailed, as herein required, the fact that the addressee does not receive it, shall not in any manner invalidate or affect the proceedings herein provided.

§ 50-1746. Proof of notice.

The treasurer shall, before issuing any deed to the municipality, make and file his affidavit showing a full compliance with the requirements of the preceding section as to giving notice of the expiration of the period of redemption; before issuing a deed to the holder of any delinquency certificate, the treasurer shall require that affidavits be filed showing a complete compliance with the provisions of the previous section as to giving such notice. Such proof shall be filed in the office of the treasurer and remain a permanent record in such office. Any person making a false affidavit as to any fact required herein shall be guilty of perjury.

§ 50-1747. Effect of deed as evidence.

The matters recited in the delinquency certificate must be recited in the deed and such deed duly acknowledged or proved shall be prima facie evidence: (1) that the improvement district was created, the assessment made and the work and improvement done in the manner provided by law; (2) that all notices were given, all hearings were had, orders made and resolutions and ordinances passed and adopted required by law, and that all the proceedings up to the execution and delivery of such deed were had and done in the manner required by law; (3) that the assessments were not paid, the delinquency entries were properly made and delinquency certificate properly issued, as prescribed by law, and by the proper officer; (4) that the property was not redeemed, that the notice required to be given before deed was taken was properly given as required by law, and that the person who executed the deed was the proper officer.

§ 50-1748. Delinquency certificate for subsequent instalments.

Whenever any delinquency certificate has been assigned, as hereinbefore provided, and the time for redemption has expired and there are outstanding against the property covered by said certificate, any delinquent instalments subsequent in time to the instalment for which the property was sold, then the treasurer shall issue to the municipality a delinquency certificate for such past due instalments in the same manner, as hereinbefore provided, and shall cancel the previous delinquency certificate and the same shall be of no further force and effect. Such delinquency certificate for subsequent instalments may be assigned in the same manner, as hereinbefore provided, and have the same force and effect.

§ 50-1749. Fees of treasurer.

The treasurer shall receive the following fees, which, when paid, shall be credited to the general fund of the municipality: for issuing any delinquency certificate twenty-five cents (25¢) to be included in the amount of the certificate; for making any deed one dollar ($1.00), to be paid by the person to whom made; for giving notice to a mortgagee or lienholder fifty cents (50¢), to be paid by such person; for giving notice of expiration of period of redemption one dollar ($1.00). In all cases where the property is deeded to the municipality the fees shall be charged to the amount for which the deed is taken and shall be paid upon the sale of the property, or the sale of the delinquency certificate.

§ 50-1750. Suit to quiet title.

Whenever the necessary costs and attorney’s fees have been advanced by the holders of the bonds of the district or any prospective purchaser or other person, it shall be the duty of the council of such municipality to cause the attorney to commence suit to quiet title to the property described in said deed in the name of the municipality and to secure the possession of the property; provided, that the property described in any number of tax deeds so made to the municipality and against any number of owners of property may be included in the same suit.

§ 50-1751. Sale of property deeded to municipality.

At any time after acquiring title and possession of any property, as hereinbefore provided, the municipality may sell such property to any purchaser upon receiving therefor a sum not less than the amount for which the property was sold to the municipality and by the payment of all instalments of assessments subsequent to the one (1) for which such property was sold and then due together with the penalties and interest thereon. The purchaser shall take such property subject to any unpaid general taxes and assessments and to all local improvement district instalments not then due, and the municipality shall thereafter collect such instalments in the manner provided by this code. When such purchase is made and the money paid therefor, the municipality shall issue a deed to the purchaser signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk, which deed shall be executed and acknowledged in the manner required, by law, to entitle the same to be recorded under the laws of this state.

In selling such property and in conveying title thereto compliance with the procedures set forth in chapter 14, title 50, Idaho Code, shall not be required, but no conveyance under this section shall be valid unless it be approved by an affirmative vote of one-half (1/2) plus one (1) member of the full city council.

§ 50-1752. Sale of property after maturity of bonds.

Within thirty (30) days after the maturity of the last instalment of any issue of bonds of a local improvement district, if any such bonds or interest coupons shall remain unpaid, any property remaining unsold, to which the municipality has taken title by reason of assessment of such improvement district, shall be appraised and immediately after said appraisement such property shall be offered for sale by giving notice of the time and place of sale thereof by publication of such notice in a newspaper published in the municipality for ten (10) consecutive issues if a daily paper, or in two (2) consecutive issues if a weekly paper, or if there be no newspaper published in such municipality then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the date of sale to be not less than twenty (20) days from the date of the first publication of such notice. At the time and place designated in the notice the treasurer shall offer such property for sale to the highest bidder, but no sale shall be made for less than the appraised value. If no bid be received for a sum equal to or greater than the appraised value, then the sale may be postponed for not to exceed thirty (30) days, and shall be readvertised, and at the time to which such sale was postponed shall again be offered for sale and sold to the highest bidder. Upon the sale of any property and the payment therefor, a deed shall be executed to the purchaser in the same manner, as provided for the execution of deeds in section 50-1751[, Idaho Code].

§ 50-1753. Disposition of funds.

All money received by the treasurer on account of the payment of assessments or instalments thereof, the assignment or redemption of delinquency certificates, or for rents, issues and profits, or from the sale of any property, title to which is held by the municipality for the benefit of any local improvement district, less any expenses of securing possession of said property, or for the care and operation and sale of the same, shall be deposited to the credit of the interest fund and bond fund of the local improvement district, in the same proportion as the assessment or instalments for which the property was taken. Any money left in a local improvement district interest or bond fund or any money derived from the rental or sale of any real property acquired by the municipality through the sale for delinquent assessments or instalments shall, after all warrants, bonds and coupons of said district have been paid in full, be credited to the general fund of the municipality.

§ 50-1754. Delinquent certificate not assignable during pendency of action.

No certificate of delinquency as hereinbefore provided, shall be assigned, or any property sold, to which the municipality has taken a deed, on account of any assessment, or instalment thereof, during the pendency of any proceeding in court affecting the validity of such assessment.

§ 50-1755. Duties of officers.

When the council shall decide that it is to the best interest of the municipality that the duties in this code designated to be performed by the treasurer should be done and performed by the clerk of such municipality, they may at their option, by resolution, duly presented and approved by such council assign such duties to the clerk of such municipality; provided, that the duty of receiving any funds collected by the clerk and the depositing and disbursing of such funds by order of the council shall always be and remain the duty and responsibility of the treasurer; the council shall, in said resolution, devise a proper system or plan whereby the clerk may pay to the treasurer all moneys collected by him and take receipts therefor.

§ 50-1756 — 50-1761. Prior districts — Construction — Separability — Validation — Limitation on assessments. [Repealed.]

§ 50-1762. Local improvement guarantee fund — Creation of fund.

Any municipal corporation, including chartered municipal corporations, may by general ordinance of appropriation or by levy of a tax of not to exceed two hundredths percent (.02%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property within the municipal corporation in any one (1) year, or by appropriation from such other sources as may be determined by the council, create a fund for the purpose of guaranteeing to the extent of such fund, the payment of bonds or warrants and interest thereon, hereafter issued against any local improvements therein; provided, that such sum so levied or appropriated in any year shall be more than sufficient to pay the outstanding warrants of said fund and to establish therein a balance, which combined levy and appropriation in any one (1) year shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the outstanding obligations thereby guaranteed; provided, further, that the council shall not levy any tax as herein provided when the amount of moneys in the “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund” equals ten percent (10%) of the total outstanding obligations thereby guaranteed. The tax levies herein authorized and directed shall be additional to and, if need be, in excess of any and all statutory and charter limitations. The fund so created shall be designated “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund.”